Oklahoma, session 2026, HB1017.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 9101 of Title 70, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
This act shall be known and may be cited as the "Oklahoma
College Athletic Conference Act".

SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 9102 of Title 70, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
The purpose of this legislation is to establish a new
intercollegiate athletic conference, with name to be determined, to
promote and regulate college athletics among member institutions
within the state. This conference will provide enhanced athletic
competition, foster community and state pride, support student-
athlete experience by giving more time in classroom and creating
higher graduation rates, reduction of university athletic budgets
due to less travel, provide better in-state rivalries to enhance
student and spectator experience, allow better in-state recruiting
thus keeping Oklahoma students in Oklahoma, and ensure compliance
with both state and federal regulations governing college athletics.
SECTION 3. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 9103 of Title 70, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
As used in the Oklahoma College Athletic Conference Act:
1. "Commission" means the body established under this act to
explore the creation of a new NCAA Division II athletic conference
in this state;
2. "NCAA" means the National Collegiate Athletic Association;
3. "NCAA Division II" means the governing body for
intercollegiate athletics for NCAA-member institutions that compete
at the Division II level, which balances athletics, academics, and
extracurricular activities;
4. "Member institutions" means accredited colleges and
universities that would be potential members of the new NCAA
Division II conference;
5. "Student-athletes" means individuals enrolled in member
institutions who participate in NCAA Division II athletics; and
6. "The conference" means a collective body of NCAA Division II
institutions that would form an organized athletic conference under
the NCAA's rules and regulations.
ENR. H. B. NO. 1017 Page 2

SECTION 4. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 9104 of Title 70, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. There is hereby created an Oklahoma NCAA Division II
Athletic Conference Exploration Commission. The Commission shall be
responsible for exploring and making recommendations regarding the
creation of a new NCAA Division II athletic conference consisting of
Oklahoma NCAA Division II schools and others to be determined and
named at a later date.
B. The Commission shall initially be composed of ten (10)
members as follows:
1. The president of Northeastern State University;
2. The president of Southwestern Oklahoma State University;
3. The president of Northwestern Oklahoma State University;
4. The president of Southeastern Oklahoma State University;
5. The president of East Central University;
6. The president of Cameron University;
7. The president of Rogers State University;
8. The president of Oklahoma Christian University;
9. The president of Southern Nazarene University; and
10. The president of Oklahoma Baptist University.
C. Membership of the Commission may be expanded to include
other institutional presidents by a majority vote of the initial
membership of the Commission if deemed appropriate.
D. The members shall elect a chairperson of the Commission from
among its members, who will lead the Commission's activities.
SECTION 5. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 9105 of Title 70, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
ENR. H. B. NO. 1017 Page 3

A. The Commission shall conduct a thorough analysis of the
feasibility of establishing a new NCAA Division II athletic
conference in Oklahoma considering the following factors:
1. Potential member institutions, including public and private
colleges and universities both inside and outside the State of
Oklahoma who voluntarily seek to join the conference;
2. The academic and athletic capabilities of potential member
institutions to support NCAA Division II athletics;
3. Geographic and logistical considerations for scheduling and
travel;
4. Financial impact and sustainability for potential member
institutions;
5. The effects on student-athletes, including opportunities for
academic and athletic growth, recruitment, and competition;
6. Potential community, regional, and economic benefits,
including sponsorships, fan engagement, and media exposure; and
7. Alignment with NCAA Division II regulations, policies, and
goals.
B. The Commission shall consult with a range of stakeholders
including, but not limited to:
1. NCAA Division II representatives and governing bodies;
2. Athletic directors, coaches, and administrators from current
NCAA Division II institutions in the region;
3. Student-athletes and athletic support staff;
4. Local government officials and business leaders; and
5. Academic and athletic organizations that focus on the
interests of Division II athletics.
C. 1. The Commission shall prepare and submit a detailed
feasibility report to the Oklahoma House of Representatives and the
Oklahoma State Senate within twelve (12) months of its first
meeting.
ENR. H. B. NO. 1017 Page 4

2. The report shall include:
a. a summary of findings from the study and
consultations,
b. a comprehensive analysis of the benefits, costs, and
risks associated with establishing a new NCAA Division
II athletic conference,
c. a list of potential member institutions, including any
recommendations for institutions that should be
invited to join,
d. a proposed timeline and framework for transitioning
into a new athletic conference, including governance
structures, policies, and membership guidelines, and
e. an assessment of funding and financial models to
support the new conference, including membership fees,
sponsorship, and broadcasting rights.
SECTION 6. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 9106 of Title 70, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. The Commission is authorized to hire independent
consultants, conduct studies, and enter into contracts with experts
in areas such as NCAA regulations, athletic conference operations,
and financial modeling to assist in the creation of its final
report.
B. The Commission may engage with the NCAA to ensure that any
proposed conference structure aligns with NCAA Division II standards
and policies.
SECTION 7. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 9107 of Title 70, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
Upon completion of the study, the Commission shall submit a
final report to the Oklahoma House of Representatives and the
Oklahoma State Senate with its findings, recommendations, and
proposed action steps for the creation of a new NCAA Division II
athletic conference. The Legislature shall review the Commission's
ENR. H. B. NO. 1017 Page 5

final report and recommendations and, if deemed appropriate,
introduce legislation to facilitate the establishment of the new
NCAA Division II conference.
SECTION 8. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 9108 of Title 70, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. There is hereby created in the State Treasury a revolving
fund for the Oklahoma NCAA Division II Athletic Conference
Exploration Commission to be designated the "Oklahoma NCAA Division
II Athletic Conference Exploration Commission Revolving Fund". The
fund shall be a continuing fund, not subject to fiscal year
limitations, and shall consist of all monies received by the
Oklahoma NCAA Division II Athletic Conference Exploration Commission
from appropriations, gifts, grants, donations, and bequests. All
monies accruing to the credit of the fund are hereby appropriated
and may be budgeted and expended by the Oklahoma NCAA Division II
Athletic Conference Exploration Commission for the purpose of
implementing the provisions of this act. Expenditures from the fund
shall be made upon warrants issued by the State Treasurer against
claims filed as prescribed by law with the Director of the Office of
Management and Enterprise Services for approval and payment.
B. The Commission may make expenditures from the Oklahoma NCAA
Division II Athletic Conference Exploration Commission Revolving
Fund to cover expenses related to studies, meetings, consultations,
and other necessary activities. Funding that is not expended by the
Commission may be used as necessary to perform the necessary
activities to create the Conference. These funds can be used for
both the initial operating costs of the Conference as well as funds
required by conference institutions to pay fees to exit their
current conference affiliation. Additional funding may be sought
from private or nonprofit sources, if necessary.
C. The Commission shall explore various funding sources,
including partnerships with private organizations, sponsorships, and
grants to help defray costs associated with the creation of the new
conference.
SECTION 9. It being immediately necessary for the preservation
of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby
declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and
be in full force from and after its passage and approval.
ENR. H. B. NO. 1017 Page 6

Passed the House of Representatives the 4th day of March, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives
Passed the Senate the 29th day of April, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the Senate
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
Received by the Office of the Governor this ____________________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
Approved by the Governor of the State of Oklahoma this _________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
_________________________________
Governor of the State of Oklahoma
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Received by the Office of the Secretary of State this __________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
ENR. H. B. NO. 1017 Page 7